District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.29

Income status of loans and grants.

The Mayor, in determining the amount of assistance payment to which an applicant or recipient of public welfare is entitled, shall not consider as income or as a resource loans and grants obtained and used under conditions that preclude their use for current living costs.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 529, 29 DCR 1060
This section is referenced in § 4-205.10.
1981 Ed., § 3-205.29.